Utah statutes.
7-18a-104.   Application of Utah Financial Institutions Act.

A foreign depository institution authorized under Section 7-18a-201 to transact business in this state through an agency, branch, or representative office is subject to this title.



Enacted by Chapter 63, 1996 General Session

